Connecticut, session 2026, SB00353.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 46a-60 of the 2026 supplement to the general
2 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
3 (Effective October 1, 2026):
4 (a) As used in this section:
5 (1) "Pregnancy" means pregnancy, childbirth or a related condition,
6 including, but not limited to, lactation;
7 (2) "Reasonable accommodation" means, but is not limited to, being
8 permitted to sit while working, more frequent or longer breaks, periodic
9 rest, assistance with manual labor, job restructuring, light duty
10 assignments, modified work schedules, temporary transfers to less
11 strenuous or hazardous work, time off to recover from childbirth or
12 break time and appropriate facilities for expressing breast milk; and
SB353 / File No. 355 1

SB353 File No. 355
13 (3) "Undue hardship" means an action requiring significant difficulty
14 or expense when considered in light of factors such as (A) the nature
15 and cost of the accommodation; (B) the overall financial resources of the
16 employer; (C) the overall size of the business of the employer with
17 respect to the number of employees, and the number, type and location
18 of its facilities; and (D) the effect on expenses and resources or the
19 impact otherwise of such accommodation upon the operation of the
20 employer.
21 (b) It shall be a discriminatory practice in violation of this section:
22 (1) For an employer, by the employer or the employer's agent, except
23 in the case of a bona fide occupational qualification or need, to refuse to
24 hire or employ or to bar or to discharge from employment any
25 individual or to discriminate against any individual in compensation or
26 in terms, conditions or privileges of employment because of the
27 individual's race, color, religious creed, age, sex, gender identity or
28 expression, marital status, national origin, ancestry, present or past
29 history of mental disability, intellectual disability, learning disability,
30 physical disability, including, but not limited to, blindness, status as a
31 veteran, status as a victim of domestic violence, status as a victim of
32 sexual assault or status as a victim of trafficking in persons;
33 (2) For any employment agency, except in the case of a bona fide
34 occupational qualification or need, to fail or refuse to classify properly
35 or refer for employment or otherwise to discriminate against any
36 individual because of such individual's race, color, religious creed, age,
37 sex, gender identity or expression, marital status, national origin,
38 ancestry, present or past history of mental disability, intellectual
39 disability, learning disability, physical disability, including, but not
40 limited to, blindness, status as a veteran, status as a victim of domestic
41 violence, status as a victim of sexual assault or status as a victim of
42 trafficking in persons;
43 (3) For a labor organization, because of the race, color, religious creed,
44 age, sex, gender identity or expression, marital status, national origin,
45 ancestry, present or past history of mental disability, intellectual
SB353 / File No. 355 2

SB353 File No. 355
46 disability, learning disability, physical disability, including, but not
47 limited to, blindness, status as a veteran, status as a victim of domestic
48 violence, status as a victim of sexual assault or status as a victim of
49 trafficking in persons of any individual to exclude from full membership
50 rights or to expel from its membership such individual or to
51 discriminate in any way against any of its members or against any
52 employer or any individual employed by an employer, unless such
53 action is based on a bona fide occupational qualification;
54 (4) For any person, employer, labor organization or employment
55 agency to discharge, expel or otherwise discriminate against any person
56 because such person has opposed any discriminatory employment
57 practice or because such person has filed a complaint or testified or
58 assisted in any proceeding under section 46a-82, 46a-83 or 46a-84;
59 (5) For any person, whether an employer or an employee or not, to
60 aid, abet, incite, compel or coerce the doing of any act declared to be a
61 discriminatory employment practice or to attempt to do so;
62 (6) For any person, employer, employment agency or labor
63 organization, except in the case of a bona fide occupational qualification
64 or need, to advertise employment opportunities in such a manner as to
65 restrict such employment so as to discriminate against individuals
66 because of their race, color, religious creed, age, sex, gender identity or
67 expression, marital status, national origin, ancestry, present or past
68 history of mental disability, intellectual disability, learning disability,
69 physical disability, including, but not limited to, blindness, status as a
70 veteran, status as a victim of domestic violence, status as a victim of
71 sexual assault or status as a victim of trafficking in persons;
72 (7) For an employer, by the employer or the employer's agent: (A) To
73 terminate a woman's employment because of her pregnancy; (B) to
74 refuse to grant to that employee a reasonable leave of absence for
75 disability resulting from her pregnancy; (C) to deny to that employee,
76 who is disabled as a result of pregnancy, any compensation to which
77 she is entitled as a result of the accumulation of disability or leave
78 benefits accrued pursuant to plans maintained by the employer; (D) to
SB353 / File No. 355 3

SB353 File No. 355
79 fail or refuse to reinstate the employee to her original job or to an
80 equivalent position with equivalent pay and accumulated seniority,
81 retirement, fringe benefits and other service credits upon her signifying
82 her intent to return unless, in the case of a private employer, the
83 employer's circumstances have so changed as to make it impossible or
84 unreasonable to do so; (E) to limit, segregate or classify the employee in
85 a way that would deprive her of employment opportunities due to her
86 pregnancy; (F) to discriminate against an employee or person seeking
87 employment on the basis of her pregnancy in the terms or conditions of
88 her employment; (G) to fail or refuse to make a reasonable
89 accommodation for an employee or person seeking employment due to
90 her pregnancy or condition related to menopause, unless the employer
91 can demonstrate that such accommodation would impose an undue
92 hardship on such employer; (H) to deny employment opportunities to
93 an employee or person seeking employment if such denial is due to the
94 employee's request for a reasonable accommodation due to her
95 pregnancy or condition related to menopause; (I) to force an employee
96 or person seeking employment affected by pregnancy or condition
97 related to menopause to accept a reasonable accommodation if such
98 employee or person seeking employment (i) does not have a known
99 limitation related to her pregnancy or condition related to menopause,
100 or (ii) does not require a reasonable accommodation to perform the
101 essential duties related to her employment; (J) to require an employee
102 to take a leave of absence if a reasonable accommodation can be
103 provided in lieu of such leave; and (K) to retaliate against an employee
104 in the terms, conditions or privileges of her employment based upon
105 such employee's request for a reasonable accommodation;
106 (8) For an employer, by the employer or the employer's agent, for an
107 employment agency, by itself or its agent, or for any labor organization,
108 by itself or its agent, to harass any employee, person seeking
109 employment or member on the basis of sex or gender identity or
110 expression. If an employer takes immediate corrective action in
111 response to an employee's claim of sexual harassment, such corrective
112 action shall not modify the conditions of employment of the employee
113 making the claim of sexual harassment unless such employee agrees, in
SB353 / File No. 355 4

SB353 File No. 355
114 writing, to any modification in the conditions of employment.
115 "Corrective action" taken by an employer, includes, but is not limited to,
116 employee relocation, assigning an employee to a different work
117 schedule or other substantive changes to an employee's terms and
118 conditions of employment. Notwithstanding an employer's failure to
119 obtain a written agreement from an employee concerning a modification
120 in the conditions of employment, the commission may find that
121 corrective action taken by an employer was reasonable and not of
122 detriment to the complainant based on the evidence presented to the
123 commission by the complainant and respondent. As used in this
124 subdivision, "sexual harassment" means any unwelcome sexual
125 advances or requests for sexual favors or any conduct of a sexual nature
126 when (A) submission to such conduct is made either explicitly or
127 implicitly a term or condition of an individual's employment, (B)
128 submission to or rejection of such conduct by an individual is used as
129 the basis for employment decisions affecting such individual, or (C)
130 such conduct has the purpose or effect of substantially interfering with
131 an individual's work performance or creating an intimidating, hostile or
132 offensive working environment;
133 (9) For an employer, by the employer or the employer's agent, for an
134 employment agency, by itself or its agent, or for any labor organization,
135 by itself or its agent, to request or require information from an
136 employee, person seeking employment or member relating to the
137 individual's child-bearing age or plans, pregnancy, function of the
138 individual's reproductive system, use of birth control methods, or the
139 individual's familial responsibilities, unless such information is directly
140 related to a bona fide occupational qualification or need, provided an
141 employer, through a physician may request from an employee any such
142 information which is directly related to workplace exposure to
143 substances which may cause birth defects or constitute a hazard to an
144 individual's reproductive system or to a fetus if the employer first
145 informs the employee of the hazards involved in exposure to such
146 substances;
147 (10) For an employer, by the employer or the employer's agent, after
SB353 / File No. 355 5

SB353 File No. 355
148 informing an employee, pursuant to subdivision (9) of this subsection,
149 of a workplace exposure to substances which may cause birth defects or
150 constitute a hazard to an employee's reproductive system or to a fetus,
151 to fail or refuse, upon the employee's request, to take reasonable
152 measures to protect the employee from the exposure or hazard
153 identified, or to fail or refuse to inform the employee that the measures
154 taken may be the subject of a complaint filed under the provisions of
155 this chapter. Nothing in this subdivision is intended to prohibit an
156 employer from taking reasonable measures to protect an employee from
157 exposure to such substances. For the purpose of this subdivision,
158 "reasonable measures" are those measures which are consistent with
159 business necessity and are least disruptive of the terms and conditions
160 of the employee's employment;
161 (11) For an employer, by the employer or the employer's agent, for an
162 employment agency, by itself or its agent, or for any labor organization,
163 by itself or its agent: (A) To request or require genetic information from
164 an employee, person seeking employment or member, or (B) to
165 discharge, expel or otherwise discriminate against any person on the
166 basis of genetic information. For the purpose of this subdivision,
167 "genetic information" means the information about genes, gene
168 products or inherited characteristics that may derive from an individual
169 or a family member;
170 (12) For an employer, by the employer or the employer's agent, to
171 request or require a prospective employee's age, date of birth, dates of
172 attendance at or date of graduation from an educational institution on
173 an initial employment application, provided the provisions of this
174 subdivision shall not apply to any employer requesting or requiring
175 such information (A) based on a bona fide occupational qualification or
176 need, or (B) when such information is required to comply with any
177 provision of state or federal law; and
178 (13) (A) For an employer or the employer's agent to deny an employee
179 a reasonable leave of absence in order to: (i) Seek attention for injuries
180 caused by domestic violence, sexual assault or trafficking in persons,
SB353 / File No. 355 6

SB353 File No. 355
181 including for a child who is a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault
182 or trafficking in persons, provided the employee is not the perpetrator
183 of any act of domestic violence, sexual assault or trafficking in persons
184 committed against a child; (ii) obtain services including safety planning
185 from a domestic violence agency or rape crisis center, as those terms are
186 defined in section 52-146k, as a result of domestic violence, sexual
187 assault or trafficking in persons; (iii) obtain psychological counseling
188 related to an incident or incidents of domestic violence, sexual assault
189 or trafficking in persons, including for a child who is a victim of
190 domestic violence, sexual assault or trafficking in persons, provided the
191 employee is not the perpetrator of any act of domestic violence, sexual
192 assault or trafficking in persons committed against a child; (iv) take
193 other actions to increase safety from future incidents of domestic
194 violence, sexual assault or trafficking in persons, including temporary
195 or permanent relocation; or (v) obtain legal services, assisting in the
196 prosecution of the offense, or otherwise participate in legal proceedings
197 in relation to the incident or incidents of domestic violence, sexual
198 assault or trafficking in persons.
199 (B) An employee who is absent from work in accordance with the
200 provisions of subparagraph (A) of this subdivision shall, within a
201 reasonable time after the absence, provide a certification to the employer
202 when requested by the employer. Such certification shall be in the form
203 of: (i) A police report indicating that the employee or the employee's
204 child was a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault or trafficking in
205 persons; (ii) a court order protecting or separating the employee or
206 employee's child from the perpetrator of an act of domestic violence,
207 sexual assault or trafficking in persons; (iii) other evidence from the
208 court or prosecuting attorney that the employee appeared in court; or
209 (iv) documentation from a medical professional, including a domestic
210 violence counselor or sexual assault counselor, as those terms are
211 defined in section 52-146k, or other health care provider, that the
212 employee or the employee's child was receiving services, counseling or
213 treatment for physical or mental injuries or abuse resulting in
214 victimization from an act of domestic violence, sexual assault or
215 trafficking in persons.
SB353 / File No. 355 7

SB353 File No. 355
216 (C) Where an employee has a physical or mental disability resulting
217 from an incident or series of incidents of domestic violence, sexual
218 assault or trafficking in persons, such employee shall be treated in the
219 same manner as an employee with any other disability.
220 (D) To the extent permitted by law, employers shall maintain the
221 confidentiality of any information regarding an employee's status as a
222 victim of domestic violence, sexual assault or trafficking in persons.
223 (c) (1) The provisions of this section concerning age shall not apply
224 to: (A) The termination of employment of any person with a contract of
225 unlimited tenure at an independent institution of higher education who
226 is mandatorily retired, on or before July 1, 1993, after having attained
227 the age of seventy; (B) the termination of employment of any person
228 who has attained the age of sixty-five and who, for the two years
229 immediately preceding such termination, is employed in a bona fide
230 executive or a high policy-making position, if such person is entitled to
231 an immediate nonforfeitable annual retirement benefit under a pension,
232 profit-sharing, savings or deferred compensation plan, or any
233 combination of such plans, from such person's employer, which equals,
234 in aggregate, at least forty-four thousand dollars; (C) the termination of
235 employment of persons in occupations, including police work and fire-
236 fighting, in which age is a bona fide occupational qualification; (D) the
237 operation of any bona fide apprenticeship system or plan; or (E) the
238 observance of the terms of a bona fide seniority system or any bona fide
239 employee benefit plan for retirement, pensions or insurance which is not
240 adopted for the purpose of evading said provisions, except that no such
241 plan may excuse the failure to hire any individual and no such system
242 or plan may require or permit the termination of employment on the
243 basis of age. No such plan which covers less than twenty employees may
244 reduce the group hospital, surgical or medical insurance coverage
245 provided under the plan to any employee who has reached the age of
246 sixty-five and is eligible for Medicare benefits or any employee's spouse
247 who has reached age sixty-five and is eligible for Medicare benefits
248 except to the extent such coverage is provided by Medicare. The terms
249 of any such plan which covers twenty or more employees shall entitle
SB353 / File No. 355 8

SB353 File No. 355
250 any employee who has attained the age of sixty-five and any employee's
251 spouse who has attained the age of sixty-five to group hospital, surgical
252 or medical insurance coverage under the same conditions as any
253 covered employee or spouse who is under the age of sixty-five.
254 (2) No employee retirement or pension plan may exclude any
255 employee from membership in such plan or cease or reduce the
256 employee's benefit accruals or allocations under such plan on the basis
257 of age. The provisions of this subdivision shall be applicable to plan
258 years beginning on or after January 1, 1988, except that for any
259 collectively bargained plan this subdivision shall be applicable on the
260 earlier of (A) January 1, 1990, or (B) the later of (i) the expiration date of
261 the collective bargaining agreement, or (ii) January 1, 1988.
262 (3) The provisions of this section concerning age shall not prohibit an
263 employer from requiring medical examinations for employees for the
264 purpose of determining such employees' physical qualification for
265 continued employment.
266 (4) Any employee who continues employment beyond the normal
267 retirement age in the applicable retirement or pension plan shall give
268 notice of intent to retire, in writing, to such employee's employer not
269 less than thirty days prior to the date of such retirement.
270 (d) (1) An employer shall provide written notice of the right to be free
271 from discrimination in relation to pregnancy, childbirth, menopause
272 and related conditions, including the right to a reasonable
273 accommodation to the known limitations related to pregnancy or
274 condition related to menopause pursuant to subdivision (7) of
275 subsection (b) of this section to: (A) New employees at the
276 commencement of employment; (B) existing employees within one
277 hundred twenty days of October 1, 2017; and (C) any employee who
278 notifies the employer of her pregnancy or condition related to
279 menopause within ten days of such notification. An employer may
280 comply with the provisions of this section by displaying a poster in a
281 conspicuous place, accessible to employees, at the employer's place of
282 business that contains the information required by this section in both
SB353 / File No. 355 9

SB353 File No. 355
283 English and Spanish. The Labor Commissioner may adopt regulations,
284 in accordance with chapter 54, to establish additional requirements
285 concerning the means by which employers shall provide such notice.
286 (2) The Commission on Human Rights and Opportunities shall
287 develop courses of instruction and conduct ongoing public education
288 efforts as necessary to inform employers, employees, employment
289 agencies and persons seeking employment about their rights and
290 responsibilities under this section.
291 Sec. 2. Subsection (a) of section 46a-56 of the 2026 supplement to the
292 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
293 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
294 (a) The commission shall:
295 (1) Investigate the possibilities of affording equal opportunity of
296 profitable employment to all persons, with particular reference to job
297 training and placement;
298 (2) Compile facts concerning discrimination in employment,
299 violations of civil liberties and other related matters;
300 (3) Investigate and proceed in all cases of discriminatory practices
301 under this chapter and noncompliance with the provisions of section 4a-
302 60, or sections 46a-68c to 46a-68f, inclusive, provided, the commission,
303 whenever it has reason to believe that a person who is a party to a
304 discriminatory practice case has engaged or is engaged in conduct that
305 constitutes a violation of part VI, of chapter 952, may refer such matter
306 to the Office of the Chief State's Attorney and said office shall conduct a
307 further investigation as deemed necessary;
308 (4) From time to time, but not less than once a year, report to the
309 Governor as provided in section 4-60, making recommendations for the
310 removal of such injustices as it may find to exist and such other
311 recommendations as it deems advisable and describing the
312 investigations, proceedings and hearings it has conducted and their
313 outcome, the decisions it has rendered and the other work it has
SB353 / File No. 355 10

SB353 File No. 355
314 performed;
315 (5) Monitor state contracts to determine whether they are in
316 compliance with section 4a-60, and those provisions of the general
317 statutes which prohibit discrimination;
318 (6) Compile data concerning state contracts with female and minority
319 business enterprises and submit a report annually to the General
320 Assembly concerning the employment of such business enterprises as
321 contractors and subcontractors;
322 (7) Develop and include on the commission's Internet web site a link
323 concerning the illegality of sexual harassment, as defined in section 46a-
324 60, as amended by this act, and the remedies available to victims of
325 sexual harassment;
326 (8) Develop and make available at no cost to employers an online
327 training and education video or other interactive method of training and
328 education that fulfills the requirements prescribed in subdivision (15) of
329 section 46a-54;
330 (9) Develop, in conjunction with organizations that advocate on
331 behalf of victims of domestic violence, and include on the commission's
332 Internet web site a link concerning domestic violence and the resources
333 available to victims of domestic violence; [and]
334 (10) Develop, in conjunction with organizations that advocate on
335 behalf of victims of domestic violence, and make available at no cost to
336 each state agency an online training and education video or other
337 interactive method of training and education that fulfills the
338 requirements prescribed in subdivision (19) of section 46a-54;
339 (11) Develop, in conjunction with organizations that advocate on
340 behalf of persons with menopause or related medical conditions, a
341 model workplace policy regarding reasonable accommodations for
342 menopause or related medical conditions and include such model
343 workplace policy on the commission's Internet web site; and
SB353 / File No. 355 11

SB353 File No. 355
344 (12) Develop, in conjunction with organizations that advocate on
345 behalf of persons with menopause or related medical conditions,
346 education materials concerning menopause and related medical
347 conditions and include such education materials on the commission's
348 Internet web site.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 46a-60
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 46a-56(a)
LAB Joint Favorable
SB353 / File No. 355 12

SB353 File No. 355
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Human Rights & Opportunities, GF - Potential Minimal Minimal
Com. Cost
Human Rights & Opportunities, GF - Potential Minimal Minimal
Com. Revenue Gain
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill prohibits menopause-related employment discrimination,
resulting in a potential minimal cost1 and minimal potential revenue
gain to the Commission on Human Rights and Opportunities (CHRO)
beginning in FY 27. The bill: (1) expands the definition of a
"discriminatory practice" under the CHRO laws to include failure to
provide reasonable accommodation for menopause-related conditions,
(2) requires employers to notify employees of their rights to reasonable
accommodation and to be free from menopause-related discrimination,
and (3) requires CHRO in concert with stakeholders to develop a model
workplace policy and educational materials concerning menopause.
The exact cost and revenue gain will depend on the number of
additional CHRO proceedings brought and fines imposed in response
to this section. These impacts are expected to be minimal.
The Out Years
1 This cost is associated with additional staff time, materials, and resources required to
facilitate additional proceedings.
SB353 / File No. 355 13

SB353 File No. 355
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the number of CHRO proceedings
and fines imposed.
SB353 / File No. 355 14

SB353 File No. 355
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 353
AN ACT CONCERNING REASONABLE ACCOMMODATIONS IN THE
WORKPLACE FOR CONDITIONS RELATED TO MENOPAUSE.